Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2131
Utilities district; water; sale; cities and villages; contract; charges; resolution by governing body.

To accomplish the purposes of section 14-2128, cities of all classes and villages, except cities of the metropolitan class, shall have the power to contract with a metropolitan utilities district and pay the charges and costs in the manner provided in the contract for the purpose of maintaining an adequate supply of water for the waterworks and distribution system serving such municipality, such contract to be approved by resolution of the governing body of such municipality.

Laws 1965, c. 79, § 2, p. 315;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1112;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 31.